Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4637.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 138.669, is amended to read: 138.669 CONTRACTS FOR HISTORIC SITE MANAGEMENT. The Minnesota Historical Society may contract deleted text begin with a county, municipality, or a county or local historical societydeleted text end for the management and operation of sites in the state historic site network. Notwithstanding section 138.668, the contract may provide for the retention of admission fees received by the management unit and for grants-in-aid to the management unit for use in the site's operation and maintenance. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end